Washington statutes.
RCW 43.132.040

Fiscal notes—Transmission of copies to designated recipients.

When a fiscal note is prepared and approved as to form and completeness by the director of financial management, the director shall transmit copies immediately to:

(1) The requesting legislator;

(2) With respect to proposed legislation held by the senate, the chairperson of the committee which holds or has acted upon the proposed legislation, the chairperson of the ways and means committee or equivalent committees with jurisdiction over matters normally considered by a ways and means committee, the chairperson of the local government committee or equivalent committee that considers local government matters, and the secretary of the senate; and

(3) With respect to proposed legislation held by the house of representatives, the chairperson of the committee which holds or has acted upon the proposed legislation, the chairpersons of the ways and means committee or equivalent committees with jurisdiction over matters normally considered by a ways and means committee, the chairperson of the local government committee or equivalent committee that considers local government matters, and the chief clerk of the house of representatives.

[ 2000 c 182 s 3; 1986 c 158 s 18; 1979 c 151 s 151; 1977 ex.s. c 19 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—2000 c 182: See note following RCW 43.132.020.